Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 8 Uniform Law on Paternity

15-8-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 320, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 194, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-6.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 67; P.L. 1996, ch. 199, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 24; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-8.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 328, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 204, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 31; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-12 — 15-8-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§

15-8-12

— 15-8-14; Repealed by P.L. 1984, ch. 204, § 1, effective May 8, 1984. For present comparable provisions of law, see §

15-8-11

.

15-8-15.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-16.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 31; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-17.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-18.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-18.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 236, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-19.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-20.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-21.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-22.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-23.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-24.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 67; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-25.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-26.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 185, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-27.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 236, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

15-8-28.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.